Tennessee, session 114, SB1781.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-5-151(c), is amended by adding
the following new sentence immediately between the first and second sentences:
The commission may notify the individual or individuals filing the petition of a defect in
the documentation.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1781
011383
- 1 -